src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NA_O_waabooz_gt-norm.yaml
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Prt+Loc: niwaaboozoonyimibaniing
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Prt+Pl: niwaaboozoonyimibaniig
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Prt+4: niwaaboozoonsimibaniin
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Prt+Loc: niwaaboozoonsimibaniing
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Prt+Pl: niwaaboozoonsimibaniig
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Prt+4: giwaaboozoonyimibaniin
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Prt+Loc: giwaaboozoonyimibaniing
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Prt+Pl: giwaaboozoonyimibaniig
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Prt+4: giwaaboozoonsimibaniin
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Prt+Loc: giwaaboozoonsimibaniing
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Prt+Pl: giwaaboozoonsimibaniig
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Prt+4: owaaboozoonyimibaniin
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Prt+Loc: owaaboozoonyimibaniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Prt+Pl: owaaboozoonyimibaniig
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Prt+4: owaaboozoonsimibaniin
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Prt+Loc: owaaboozoonsimibaniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Prt+Pl: owaaboozoonsimibaniig
     X+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Prt+4: iwaaboozoonyimibaniin
     X+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Prt+Loc: iwaaboozoonyimibaniing
     X+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Prt+Pl: iwaaboozoonyimibaniig
     X+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Prt+4: iwaaboozoonsimibaniin
     X+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Prt+Loc: iwaaboozoonsimibaniing
     X+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Prt+Pl: iwaaboozoonsimibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: niwaaboozoonyishinaaniban
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: niwaaboozoonyishinaanidig
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: niwaaboozoonsishinaaniban
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: niwaaboozoonsishinaanidig
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: giwaaboozoonyishinaaniban
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: giwaaboozoonyishinaanidig
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: giwaaboozoonyishiwaaban
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: giwaaboozoonyishiwaadig
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: giwaaboozoonsishinaaniban
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: giwaaboozoonsishinaanidig
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: giwaaboozoonsishiwaaban
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: giwaaboozoonsishiwaadig
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt: owaaboozoonyishiniiban
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: owaaboozoonyishiniidig
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: owaaboozoonyishiwaaban
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: owaaboozoonyishiwaadig
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt: owaaboozoonsishiniiban
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: owaaboozoonsishiniidig
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: owaaboozoonsishiwaaban
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: owaaboozoonsishiwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 7
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+4: niwaaboozoonyishinaanin
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: niwaaboozoonyishinaaning
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: niwaaboozoonyishinaanig
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+4: niwaaboozoonsishinaanin
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: niwaaboozoonsishinaaning
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: niwaaboozoonsishinaanig
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+4: giwaaboozoonyishinaanin
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozoonyishinaaning
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozoonyishinaanig
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+Pl+4: giwaaboozoonyishiwaan
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozoonyishiwaang
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozoonyishiwaag
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+4: giwaaboozoonsishinaanin
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozoonsishinaaning
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozoonsishinaanig
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+4: giwaaboozoonsishiwaan
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozoonsishiwaang
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozoonsishiwaag
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+4: owaaboozoonyishiniwa
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Loc: owaaboozoonyishiniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Pl: owaaboozoonyishiniwa
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+Pl+4: owaaboozoonyishiwaan
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: owaaboozoonyishiwaang
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: owaaboozoonyishiwaag
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+4: owaaboozoonsishiniwa
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Loc: owaaboozoonsishiniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Pl: owaaboozoonsishiniwa
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+4: owaaboozoonsishiwaan
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: owaaboozoonsishiwaang
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: owaaboozoonsishiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 6, 7
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: niwaaboozoonyishibaniin
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: niwaaboozoonyishibaniing
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: niwaaboozoonyishibaniig
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: niwaaboozoonsishibaniin
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: niwaaboozoonsishibaniing
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: niwaaboozoonsishibaniig
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: giwaaboozoonyishibaniin
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: giwaaboozoonyishibaniing
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: giwaaboozoonyishibaniig
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: giwaaboozoonsishibaniin
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: giwaaboozoonsishibaniing
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: giwaaboozoonsishibaniig
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: owaaboozoonyishibaniin
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: owaaboozoonyishibaniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: owaaboozoonyishibaniig
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: owaaboozoonsishibaniin
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: owaaboozoonsishibaniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: owaaboozoonsishibaniig
     X+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: iwaaboozoonyishibaniin
     X+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: iwaaboozoonyishibaniing
     X+waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: iwaaboozoonyishibaniig
     X+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: iwaaboozoonsishibaniin
     X+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: iwaaboozoonsishibaniing
     X+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: iwaaboozoonsishibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 6, 7
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: niwaaboozoonyinaanibaniin
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: niwaaboozoonyinaanibaniing
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: niwaaboozoonyinaanibaniig
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: niwaaboozoonyinaanidigan
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: niwaaboozoonyinaanidiging
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: niwaaboozoonyinaanidigag
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: niwaaboozoonsinaanibaniin
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: niwaaboozoonsinaanibaniing
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: niwaaboozoonsinaanibaniig
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: niwaaboozoonsinaanidigan
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: niwaaboozoonsinaanidiging
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: niwaaboozoonsinaanidigag
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+4: giwaaboozoonyinaanibaniin
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: giwaaboozoonyinaanibaniing
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: giwaaboozoonyinaanibaniig
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: giwaaboozoonyinaanidigan
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozoonyinaanidiging
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozoonyinaanidigag
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+3+Pl+Prt+4: giwaaboozoonyiwaabaniin
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: giwaaboozoonyiwaabaniing
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: giwaaboozoonyiwaabaniig
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: giwaaboozoonyiwaadigan
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozoonyiwaadiging
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozoonyiwaadigag
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+4: giwaaboozoonsinaanibaniin
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: giwaaboozoonsinaanibaniing
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: giwaaboozoonsinaanibaniig
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: giwaaboozoonsinaanidigan
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozoonsinaanidiging
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozoonsinaanidigag
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+4: giwaaboozoonsiwaabaniin
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: giwaaboozoonsiwaabaniing
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: giwaaboozoonsiwaabaniig
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: giwaaboozoonsiwaadigan
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozoonsiwaadiging
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozoonsiwaadigag
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+3+4+Prt+4: owaaboozoonyiniibaniin
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+3+4+Prt+Loc: owaaboozoonyiniibaniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+3+4+Prt+Pl: owaaboozoonyiniibaniig
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: owaaboozoonyiniidigan
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: owaaboozoonyiniidiging
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: owaaboozoonyiniidigag
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+3+Pl+Prt+4: owaaboozoonyiwaabaniin
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: owaaboozoonyiwaabaniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: owaaboozoonyiwaabaniig
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: owaaboozoonyiwaadigan
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: owaaboozoonyiwaadiging
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: owaaboozoonyiwaadigag
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt+4: owaaboozoonsiniibaniin
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt+Loc: owaaboozoonsiniibaniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt+Pl: owaaboozoonsiniibaniig
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: owaaboozoonsiniidigan
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: owaaboozoonsiniidiging
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: owaaboozoonsiniidigag
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+4: owaaboozoonsiwaabaniin
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: owaaboozoonsiwaabaniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: owaaboozoonsiwaabaniig
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: owaaboozoonsiwaadigan
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: owaaboozoonsiwaadiging
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: owaaboozoonsiwaadigag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: niwaaboozomishinaaniban
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: niwaaboozomishinaanidig
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: giwaaboozomishinaaniban
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: giwaaboozomishinaanidig
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: giwaaboozomishiwaaban
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: giwaaboozomishiwaadig
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt: owaaboozomishiniiban
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: owaaboozomishiniidig
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: owaaboozomishiwaaban
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: owaaboozomishiwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+4: niwaaboozomishinaanin
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: niwaaboozomishinaaning
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: niwaaboozomishinaanig
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+4: giwaaboozomishinaanin
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozomishinaaning
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozomishinaanig
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+4: giwaaboozomishiwaan
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozomishiwaang
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozomishiwaag
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+4: owaaboozomishiniwa
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+Loc: owaaboozomishiniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+Pl: owaaboozomishiniwa
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+4: owaaboozomishiwaan
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: owaaboozomishiwaang
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: owaaboozomishiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: niwaaboozomishibaniin
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: niwaaboozomishibaniing
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: niwaaboozomishibaniig
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: giwaaboozomishibaniin
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: giwaaboozomishibaniing
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: giwaaboozomishibaniig
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: owaaboozomishibaniin
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: owaaboozomishibaniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: owaaboozomishibaniig
     X+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: iwaaboozomishibaniin
     X+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: iwaaboozomishibaniing
     X+waabooz+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: iwaaboozomishibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+4: niwaaboozominaanibaniin
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: niwaaboozominaanibaniing
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: niwaaboozominaanibaniig
